Vermont, session 2025-2026, H125.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
12 Sec. 1. 30 V.S.A. § 8012 is added to read:
13 § 8012. ENERGY TRANSITION ECONOMIC IMPACTS REPORT
14 (a) On or before January 15 of each year, the Department of Public
15 Service, in consultation with the relevant State agencies, shall publish a report
16 on the economic impacts of the clean energy transition in the State.
17 (b) The report shall include:
18 (1) the number of gas stations operating within the State and if there
19 was any change in the number in the prior year;

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.125
2025 Page 2 of 4
1 (2) the number of heating fuel sellers operating in the State and if there
2 was any change in the number in the prior year;
3 (3) the number of electric vehicle supply equipment in the State and if
4 there was any change in the number in the prior year;
5 (4) electric rates and whether there were any changes; and
6 (5) the number of renewable energy development companies operating
7 within the State.
8 (c) The State agencies that collect data related to the topics in subsection
9 (b) of this section shall provide the Department with relevant data for this
10 report.
11 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
12 This act shall take effect on passage.
Sec. 1. ENERGY TRANSITION ECONOMIC IMPACTS REPORT
(a) On or before December 15, 2025, the Secretary of Natural Resources,
in consultation with the relevant State agencies, including the Agency of
Agriculture, Food and Markets, the Department of Public Service, the Agency
of Transportation, the Department of Labor, the Agency of Commerce and
Community Development, and the Department of Taxes, shall publish a report
that highlights existing data sources and indicators relevant to the impacts of
the changing energy landscape on Vermonters and relevant to understanding
the distribution of benefits and burdens by region.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.125
2025 Page 3 of 4
(b) The report shall provide data for the previous five years. The report
shall include:
(1) current and forecasted electric rates and the number of customers
with electric vehicle rates;
(2) the total megawatts of distributed solar generation facilities,
including the amount installed, by county and any active certificate of public
good applications;
(3) the number of sellers and volume of heating fuel sales;
(4) the number of homes receiving incentivized weatherization services,
by income level and county;
(5) firms and workers in thermal and renewable energy sector trades;
(6) gasoline and diesel transportation fuel sales;
(7) the number and location of retail gasoline and diesel outlets as
indicated by metered pumps;
(8) progress in electric vehicle supply equipment installation, both fast
charging and Level 2, to meet recommendations in the Comprehensive Energy
Plan and Climate Action Plan and their locations;
(9) vehicle registrations by fuel type for light, medium, and heavy-duty
vehicles; and
(10) fossil fuel and electricity consumption per unit of economic output.
(c) The report shall also include:

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.125
2025 Page 4 of 4
(1) regional distribution and graphic displays of the data compiled;
(2) an analysis of the data and recommendations of any additional data
necessary to illustrate the impacts of the changing energy landscape by region;
(3) an identification of existing reports and requirements that may
support the reporting of relevant indicators;
(4) consideration of equity and just transition indicators, with the goal
of better understanding the benefits and burdens of the changing energy
landscape by region; and
(5) any recommendations for future reporting requirements, including
how and when all relevant data can be mapped.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.